Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2216.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 21.9
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE EMPLOYMENT BACKGROUND CHECKS
16-21.9-1. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(1) “Abused or neglected child” or “child abuse” shall have the same meaning as defined
in § 40-11-2.
(2) "Sexual misconduct" means any verbal, nonverbal, written, or electronic
communication, or any other act directed toward or with a student that is designed to establish a
sexual relationship with the student, including a sexual invitation, dating or soliciting a date,
engaging in sexual dialogue, making sexually suggestive comments, self-disclosure or physical
exposure of a sexual or erotic nature, and any other sexual, indecent or erotic contact with a student.
16-21.9-2. Requirements for certain school employees.
(a) A school district, charter school, nonpublic school, or contracted service provider
holding a contract with a school district, charter school, or nonpublic school shall not employ for
pay or contract for the paid services of any person serving in a position which involves regular
contact with students unless the school district, charter school, nonpublic school, or contracted
service provider:

(1) Conducts any criminal background check of the applicant required by the provisions of
§ 16-2-18.1.
(2) Requires the applicant to provide:
(i) A list, including name, address, telephone number and other relevant contact
information of the applicant’s:
(A) Current employer;
(B) All former employers within the last twenty (20) years that were schools;
(C) All former employers within the last twenty (20) years where the applicant was
employed in a position that involved direct contact with children; and
(D) A written authorization that consents to and authorizes disclosure of the information
requested under this section and the release of related records by the applicant's employers listed
under this section, and that releases those employers from liability that may arise from the
disclosure or release of records;
(ii) A written statement as to whether the applicant:
(A) Has been the subject of any child abuse or sexual misconduct investigation by any
employer, state licensing agency, law enforcement agency, or the department of children, youth
and families, and if applicable, whether the investigation resulted in a finding that the allegations
were false or the alleged incident of child abuse or sexual misconduct was not substantiated;
(B) Has ever been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked to resign from employment,
resigned from or otherwise separated from any employment while allegations of child abuse or
sexual misconduct were pending or under investigation, or as a result of an adjudication or finding
of child abuse or sexual misconduct;
(C) Has ever had a professional license, or certificate suspended, surrendered, or revoked
while allegations of child abuse or sexual misconduct were pending or under investigation, or as a
result of an adjudication or finding of child abuse or sexual misconduct; or
(D) Has ever been the subject of a lawsuit, claim or complaint by an individual claiming
that the applicant abused or neglected a child.
(b) An employment hiring entity subject to subsection (a) of this section, upon receipt of
the information and documentation required pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section, shall
conduct a review of and confirm the circumstances of the employment history of the applicant by
contacting those employers listed by the applicant and requesting the following information:
(1) The dates of employment of the applicant; and
(2) A statement as to whether the applicant:
(i) Was the subject of any child abuse or sexual misconduct investigation by the employer,
LC004052 - Page 2 of 5

a state licensing agency, a law enforcement agency, or the department of children, youth and
families, or applicable state investigated agency;
(ii) Was disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked to resign from employment, resigned
from or otherwise separated from any employment while allegations of child abuse or sexual
misconduct were pending or under investigation, or due to an adjudication or finding of child abuse
or sexual misconduct; and
(iii) Has ever had a professional license, or certificate suspended, surrendered, or revoked
while allegations of child abuse or sexual misconduct were pending or under investigation, or due
to an adjudication or finding of child abuse or sexual misconduct.
(c) The review of the employment history may be conducted through telephonic, electronic,
or written communications. If the review is conducted by telephone, the results of the review shall
be documented in writing by the prospective employer.
16-21.9-3. Penalties.
(a) An applicant who willfully provides false information or willfully fails to disclose
information required in §16-21.9-2:
(1) Shall be subject to discipline up to, and including, termination or denial of employment;
and
(2) May be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(b) A school district, charter school, nonpublic school, or contracted service provider
holding a contract with a school district, charter school, or nonpublic school shall include a
notification of the penalties set forth in this section on all applications for employment for positions
which involve regular contact with students.
16-21.9-4. Verification of prior employment information.
(a) No later than twenty (20) days after receiving a request for information and the
applicant’s signed authorization under §16-21.9-2, a Rhode Island employer that has or had an
employment relationship within the last twenty (20) years with the applicant shall disclose the
information requested.
(b) The employment hiring entity subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
in conducting the review of the employment history of an out-of-state applicant, shall make, and
document with specificity, diligent efforts to:
(1) Verify the information provided by the applicant pursuant to this chapter; and
(2) Obtain from any co-operating out-of-state employers listed by the applicant the
information requested pursuant to this chapter.
(c) If an out-of-state employer fails to provide the information requested pursuant to §16-
LC004052 - Page 3 of 5

21.9-2, within the twenty (20) days, then the employment hiring entity shall to the extent reasonably
available review and document the applicant's prior out-of-state employment history from
alternative sources to include, but not be limited to, any employment records in the applicant's
possession, contact with the applicant's former supervisors or co-employees, information from
licensing agencies, documentation from unions or professional organizations and tax returns of the
applicant.
(c) If the result of the background check conducted pursuant to § 16-2-18.1 is negative
regarding any disqualifying information but the responses to either the applicant's questions
required pursuant to § 16-21.9-2(a)(2), or any information received in the course of the verification
pursuant to § 16-21.9-4 raises questions regarding the applicant's character or fitness to interact
with children, then the hiring entity shall not allow or permit any access by the applicant to any
child or student in the care, custody or supervision of the hiring entity unless and until after final
investigation and the applicant has been cleared of all possible past wrongful conduct subject to
this chapter, and the hiring entity has established that the applicant possesses appropriate character
and fitness to interact and supervise children.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004052
========
LC004052 - Page 4 of 5